Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 26.6 The Renewable Energy Growth Program
39-26.6-16.
Enrollment program.

Each enrollment shall be open for a two-week (2) period during which the electric distribution company is required to receive standard short-form applications. The standard short-form application shall require the applicant to provide the following information: the project owner’s identity; the location of the proposed project; the nameplate capacity of the proposed project; and renewable energy class of the proposed project. The standard short-form application shall allow project owners to provide additional information relative to the permitting, financial feasibility, ability to build, and timing for deployment of the proposed projects. The applicant must submit an affidavit with the standard short-form application confirming that the project is not in violation of the rules that prohibit project segmentation, as set forth in §

39-26.6-9

.

For large distributed-generation projects only, the standard short-form application shall also require the applicant to bid a bundled price that applies to the energy, renewable energy certificates, and all other environmental attributes and market products that are available, or may become available, from the distributed-generation facility on a per-kilowatt-hour basis measured from the output of the project. At the election of the electric distribution company, and subject to the approval of the commission, the bid may be required to include the sale of capacity.

For (i) Small distributed-generation projects other than small-scale and medium-scale solar projects; and (ii) Large distributed-generation projects, the electric distribution company shall select projects based on the lowest proposed prices received that do not exceed the ceiling price from the distributed-generation projects that meet the requirements of all applicable tariffs and regulations, and meet the criteria of the renewable energy class in effect, until the class target is met. Performance-based incentives shall be awarded to the winning bidders based on their bids submitted.

For small-scale and medium-scale solar projects, awards shall be made in the manner set forth in §§

39-26.6-15

and

39-26.6-19

.

If there are more projects bidding at the same price than the capacity that is specified for a class target, the electric distribution company shall, in consultation with the board and the office, select first those projects that appear to be the furthest along in development and that are most likely to be deployed. Those projects that are likely to be deployed at the earliest time shall be selected first. To the extent the electric distribution company is unable to make a clear distinction on this basis, the electric distribution company shall report its findings to the board and not award bids for those projects that are tied on pricing. In that case, the board may take such action as it deems appropriate for the selection of projects, including seeking more information from the projects.

Should the electric distribution company determine that it has made sufficient awards to achieve a program-year class target, it shall immediately report this fact to the board, the office, and the commission, and may cease making awards for that renewable energy class for the remainder of the program year. In any event, the electric distribution company may exceed the renewable energy class target if the last award may cause the total purchased to exceed the target.

The board, the office, and the electric distribution company shall enter into a memorandum of understanding regarding the sharing of the information and data related to the renewable energy growth program, including, without limitation, information on bids received, details regarding project ownership, and pricing. At the request of the board, the office, or the electric distribution company, the commission shall have the authority to protect from public disclosure individual bid information for any projects that have not been awarded performance-based incentives.

The electric distribution company is authorized to award bids up to the applicable ceiling price. As long as the terms of the tariff are met, and the pricing is no higher than the applicable ceiling price, such awards shall be deemed prudent and approved by the commission for purposes of recovering the costs in rates.

With respect to any procurement that includes bids from pre-existing, hydroelectric generation, the electric distribution company, in consultation with the office, shall have the authority to accept the applicant’s representation that its investment is material, within the meaning of §

39-26.6-3(6)

. However, if the electric distribution company or the office questions whether the material investment standard has been met or the application is otherwise rejected, the application shall be submitted to the board for review and the board shall draw its own conclusion and make a recommendation to the commission at the time the commission is approving awards from the procurement to which the application pertains. The commission shall have the final authority to make the determination as to whether the material investment standard has been met. Nothing in this subsection shall preclude a project developer from seeking a preliminary confirmation of eligibility for the material-investment exemption from the electric distribution company, the office, and the board prior to the submittal of a bid. In such case, if there is any disagreement, the final determination shall be submitted to the commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 216, § 1.

39-26.6-17.
Excess enrollment not required.

The electric distribution company shall not be required to award bids in excess of the annual target for the applicable program year and shall not be required to procure projects in excess of any limit set by the board and approved by the commission for a given enrollment. However, the electric distribution company, in consultation with the board and the office, may voluntarily exceed an enrollment period limit as long as it does not exceed an annual target for the applicable program year. At its election, the electric distribution company may exceed an annual target for the applicable program year after review by the board and approval by the commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 216, § 1.

39-26.6-18.
Utility right to separately meter.

Owners of medium-scale, commercial-scale, and large-scale solar projects and other distributed-generation technologies shall be required to provide, at their cost, a revenue-quality meter to standards approved by the division of public utilities and carriers and provide access to the information from the meter to the electric distribution company to measure the output of the generation. The electric distribution company shall have the discretion to install the second meter in a parallel configuration to the retail meter or behind the meter, provided that a parallel installation shall have no effect on the right of the customer to net meter using the net of the two meters. The electric distribution company also shall have the right to install its own revenue-quality meter for small-scale solar projects if not being supplied by the owner. The electric distribution company shall recover the installation and capital cost of the separate meters it installs for small-scale solar projects in the annual reconciliation of solar costs under §

39-26.6-25

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 216, § 1.

39-26.6-19.
Coordination with energy-efficiency programs.

In consultation with the office, the electric distribution company may make a request to the commission that up to half of the megawatts for the small- and medium-scale solar project enrollments be allocated by the commission for selection through a process coordinated with the energy-efficiency program in order that specified solar incentives may be tied with energy-efficiency program incentives in order to allow the electric distribution company to implement a coordinated, energy efficiency and solar program offering. In this case, the electric distribution company will propose criteria for eligibility for performance-based incentives for solar that require certain energy-efficiency standards be met at the customer location in order to be eligible for performance-based incentives for a small-scale and/or medium-scale solar installation.

The electric distribution company must also include program parameters that do not disrupt competition among small-scale and/or medium-scale solar developers, including, without limitation, safeguards against any one, or subset of, developers in this market being given exclusive rights or other market advantages over competitors. In approving the proposal, the commission must find that there is no such small- and medium-solar-market disruption.

The commission shall approve the request of the distribution company within ninety (90) days, making such modifications as it deems reasonable, provided the modifications are consistent with the legislative purposes of this chapter and the state’s energy-efficiency goals.

The allocation of megawatts is for implementation purposes only and shall not authorize funds to be shifted from the distributed-generation growth program to energy-efficiency programs, nor will implementation of the electric distribution company’s request cause a reduction of the annual or cumulative capacity goals established for the distributed-generation growth program. To the extent that the megawatts allocated to the energy-efficiency program pursuant to this section are not committed during a program year, such uncommitted megawatts shall be allocated back to the distributed-generation growth program in the following year or such year the board recommends to the commission. Funding for the energy-efficiency measures that are tied to the solar installations must be obtained separately from the energy-efficiency program budget funded through applicable energy-efficiency charges.

Should the small-scale and medium-scale project classes in the renewable energy growth program be oversubscribed in two (2) consecutive enrollments and there are megawatts that have not been committed through the process coordinated with the energy-efficiency program after the second enrollment, the board, after consultation with the office and the electric distribution company, shall have the authority to move all, or a portion of, the uncommitted megawatts out of the coordinated program back to the renewable energy growth program to meet the demand of the oversubscription, subject to commission approval. If, in such case, the board does not exercise the authority, any party may file a petition to the commission requesting action to be taken.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 216, § 1.

39-26.6-20.
Issuance of certificates and right to incentive payments.

For small-scale and medium-scale solar projects, the electric distribution company shall provide certificates of eligibility to the selected projects without commission confirmation of approval (“distribution company awarded certificates”), subject to the review and consent of the office. The electric distribution company shall file with the commission a list of all these distribution-company-awarded certificates.

For commercial-scale and large-scale solar, and all other distributed-generation projects, the electric distribution company shall file with the commission a list of the distributed-generation projects selected together with the corresponding pricing information. Within sixty (60) days of receipt of the list, the commission shall issue an order awarding certificates of eligibility to the distributed-generation projects (“PUC awarded certificates”).

Upon receipt of a PUC-awarded certificate or a distribution-company certificate, a distributed-generation project shall be entitled to receive, and the electric distribution company shall pay and/or credit (as applicable), the performance-based incentives for the specified term, and under the terms and conditions of the applicable tariff in the manner set forth below.

The performance-based incentive shall be the price-per-kilowatt-hour that was bid and awarded, or established as a standard incentive, as applicable. The performance-based incentive shall be applied as a price-per-kilowatt-hour for all kilowatt-hours actually produced from the distributed generation (net of station service, if any) for the term of years specified in the applicable tariff, less the value of any kilowatt-hour charges that were offset by any net metering (if applicable) for the host customer associated with the distributed generation for the billing month; provided, however, if the value of kilowatt-hour charges that otherwise would be offset by net metering in a given month exceeds the total value of the performance-based incentive for the month, the customer shall not be subject to any additional charge, nor receive any additional net-metering credit, for the difference between the performance-based incentive value and net-metering value for the month.

Except as provided herein for residential small-scale solar projects, in every case where a distributed-generation project can be configured for net metering, it shall be the election of the owner of the generation to choose one of two (2) separate methods through which the owner will be compensated for the performance-based incentive:

The owner is compensated solely through direct payments under the performance-based incentive provisions of this chapter for the life of the tariff term with no net metering implemented; or

The owner is compensated through a combination of direct payments and the bill credit value of net metering for the life of the term of the tariff under the provisions of this chapter.

In the case of residential small-scale solar projects, only option (2) shall be available.

In either option, the total value of the performance-based incentive per-kilowatt-hour is the same. An owner shall have a one-time right to switch the compensation methods after the generation commences operation, provided that at least sixty (60) days’ notice is given to the electric distribution company. Thereafter, any further compensation method switches shall be at the sole discretion of the electric distribution company if requested again by the owner.

Every owner who elects the compensation method shall:

Receive compensation solely in the form of a check from the electric distribution company, or other payment method that is mutually agreed between the electric distribution company and the owner; and

Shall receive compensation in the form of offsets against its electricity bill from the electric distribution company from net metering and the balance in the form of a check from the electric distribution company, or other payment method that is mutually agreed upon between the electric distribution company and the owner; provided, however, that no owner of a distributed-generation project may be compensated twice for the same kilowatt hour of electricity, and that every self-generator shall receive the full pecuniary benefit of its election to participate in the performance-based incentive program.

Every owner of a distributed-generation project that can be configured for net metering that elects the first option for compensation under the provisions of subsection (e) shall become eligible to net meter its output in conformity with the provisions of existing law upon the completion of the full term of the applicable tariff. Nothing in this section shall preclude a customer from electing not to participate in the performance-based program and electing simply to net meter under the provisions of existing law; provided, however, once an election is made to participate, the customer will remain subject to the performance-based tariff conditions and may not terminate the arrangement without the consent of the electric distribution company.

As provided in §

39-26.6-9

, any project developer may designate a generation unit on the same parcel or contiguous parcel for net metering, provided that such unit or portion of such unit designated for net metering is not receiving performance-based incentives under this chapter, is capable of being segregated electrically, is configured with such electrical segregation, and is separately metered.

All distributed-generation projects accepting certificates shall be obligated to abide by all the terms and conditions of the approved, applicable tariff.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 216, § 1.

39-26.6-21.
Ownership of output, other attributes, and renewable energy certificates.

Except as provided herein for residential small-scale solar projects, distributed-generation projects participating in the renewable energy growth program shall transfer to the electric distribution company the rights and title to:

Those renewable energy certificates generated by the project during the term of the applicable, performance-based incentive tariff;

All energy produced by the generation that is not otherwise consumed on site under a net-metering arrangement; and

Rights to any other environmental attributes or market products that are created or produced by the project; provided, however, that it shall be the election of the electric distribution company whether it chooses to acquire the capacity of the distributed-generation projects under the tariffs set forth in this chapter and no ceiling prices recommended by the board and approved by the commission will be adjusted downward in light of the electric distribution company’s election. The electric distribution company shall: (1) Sell any products acquired and credit them to the reconciliation account specified in §

39-26.6-25

; and/or (2) Use the products to serve customers and establish a price to be credited by customers using the products based on recent and near-term projections of market prices. When a generator reverts to net metering after the end of the tariff term under the renewable energy growth program, the net-metering generator shall retain title to the renewable energy certificates generated by the project. In the case of residential small-scale projects, title to all energy and capacity produced from the solar generation shall remain with the residential customer; shall not be transferred to the electric distribution company; and shall be deemed consumed by the residential customer on-site during the applicable, distribution-service billing period with no sale or purchase between the residential customer and the electric distribution company.

For the accounting purposes of the electric distribution company in treating the performance-based incentives, the cost of the energy that is procured shall be the real-time market price of energy and the balance of the performance-based incentive shall be attributable to the purchase of environmental and any other attributes acquired. This accounting shall have no effect on the total, bundled performance-based incentive to which the distributed-generation project is entitled under the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 216, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 149, § 4; P.L. 2016, ch. 163, § 4.

39-26.6-22.
Zonal and other incentive payments.

In order to provide the electric distribution company with the flexibility to encourage distributed-generation projects to be located in designated geographical areas within its load zone where there is an identifiable system benefit, reliability benefit, or cost savings to the distribution system in that geographical area, the electric distribution company, in consultation with the board and the office, may propose to include an incentive-payment adder to the bid price of any winning bidder that proposes a distributed-generation project in the desired geographical area. The electric distribution company also may propose other incentive payments to achieve other technical or public policy objectives that provide identifiable benefits to customers. Any incentive-payment adders must be approved by the commission, and shall not be counted as part of the bid price when the bids are selected at an enrollment event.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 216, § 1.

39-26.6-23.
Intersection of distributed generation and net metering.

Net-metering credits for excess generation shall not be credited during the term of the tariff when the distributed-generation project is receiving performance-based incentive payments under the tariff. After the end of the term of the performance-based incentive tariff applicable to a distributed-generation project, net-metering credits for excess generation in any given month shall be credited to the net-metered account at the applicable rate allowed under the law.

All distributed-generation projects that had begun development prior to the date the commission approves the first set of ceiling price recommendations from the board and that are in operation by no later than July 1, 2016, shall be eligible to continue operation under the net-metering rules that would have been applicable to that self-generation project absent the change in law set forth in this section, provided that the project does not otherwise participate in the performance-based incentive program set forth in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 216, § 1.

39-26.6-24.
Rate design review by the commission.

On or after July 1, 2015, the commission shall open a docket to consider rate design and distribution cost allocation among rate classes in light of net metering and the changing distribution system that is expected to include more distributed-energy resources, including, but not limited to, distributed generation. The commission will determine the appropriate cost responsibility and contributions to the operation, maintenance, and investment in the distribution system that is relied upon by all customers, including, without limitation, non-net-metered and net-metered customers. In that docket, the commission shall require the electric distribution company to file a revenue-neutral allocated-cost-of-service study for all rate classes and a proposal for new rates for all customers in each rate class. The electric distribution company shall use the distribution-revenue requirement upon which the then-current distribution rates were set. The electric distribution company may use the allocated cost of service that was filed with the compliance filing from the rate case when the then-current distribution rates were set. The commission may also address the rate design for the equitable recovery of costs associated with energy efficiency and any renewable energy programs that are recovered in rates.

In establishing any new rates the commission may deem appropriate, the commission shall take into account and balance the following factors:

The benefits of distributed-energy resources;

The distribution services being provided to net-metered customers when the distributed generation is not producing electricity;

Simplicity, understandability, and transparency of rates to all customers, including non-net-metered and net-metered customers;

Equitable ratemaking principles regarding the allocation of the costs of the distribution system;

Cost causation principles;

The general assembly’s legislative purposes in creating the distributed-generation growth program; and

Any other factors the commission deems relevant and appropriate in establishing a fair rate structure. The rates shall be designed for each proposed rate class in accordance with industry-standard, cost-allocation principles. The commission may consider any reasonable rate design options, including without limitation, fixed charges, minimum-monthly charges, demand charges, volumetric charges, or any combination thereof, with the purpose of assuring recovery of costs fairly across all rate classes.

The commission shall issue an order in the docket by no later than March 1, 2016. Any new rates shall take effect for usage on and after April 1, 2016; provided, however, that the electric distribution company may seek an extension if necessary to make the billing system changes necessary to implement a new rate structure. After new, revenue-neutral rates are set in the docket specified above, the commission may approve changes to the rate design in any future distribution-base-rate cases when a fully allocated embedded cost-of-service study is being reviewed in the rate case, subject to the principles set forth in subsection (b) of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 216, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 59, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 62, § 1.

39-26.6-25.
Forecasted rate and reconciliation.

Three (3) months prior to the beginning of the first program year, the electric distribution company shall file a forecast of the total amount of payments that is likely to be paid out to distributed-generation projects in the coming program year within the electric distribution company’s load zone, along with any costs permitted for recovery pursuant to §§

39-26.6-4

,

39-26.6-13

and

39-26.6-18

. The total of all forecasted payments and costs shall be aggregated, net of forecasted revenues from the sale of the energy, renewable energy certificates, and any other market products from the distributed-generation projects participating in the performance-based incentive program. The forecasted net-aggregate amount shall be used to design a fixed monthly charge per customer to recover the net forecast in rates charged to all distribution customers during the prospective calendar year, which fixed charge may be different by rate class in order to reasonably and equitably spread the program costs across all customer classes. The fixed rate shall stay in effect until changed after the first reconciliation filing set forth below and the rate reconciliation process shall be repeated annually, as set forth below. The commission, in its discretion, may move the reconciliation of costs and credits under §

39-26.1-5(f)

into this reconciliation in order to have one reconciliation of all program costs and credits from the long-term contracting standard, distributed-generation standard contracting, and renewable energy growth program.

Within three (3) months after the end of each program year, the electric distribution company shall reconcile the total amount recovered from distribution customers against the total of net payments and costs for the program year. The electric distribution company shall file the reconciliation with a report, along with a new forecast of payments to be made for the next twelve-month (12) period, net of forecasted revenues for the resale of energy, renewable energy certificates, or any other market attributes sold by the electric distribution company. The forecast shall be used to set a new rate in the same manner as set forth above and the new rate shall remain in effect until rates are reset in the next annual reconciliation and the reconciliation balance shall be reflected in the new rate.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 216, § 1.

39-26.6-26.
Shared solar facilities.

In order to facilitate the adoption of solar by customers in multifamily structures, campuses, multi-structure business parks, multi-tenant or multi-owner commercial facilities, and public entities with multiple accounts, the electric distribution company may establish rules and tariffs for program years starting on or after April 1, 2016. The rules and tariffs will set forth the requirements for eligible recipients, credit transfers, consumer protection, and other considerations and terms, with input from the office, for the commission’s review and approval.

Shared solar facilities will receive the same ceiling price and enroll from the same classes of other projects of the same size and ownership as established by the board for a given program year.

All customer accounts receiving bill credits shall be in the same customer class and the bill credit value from the shared solar facility shall be determined by the recipients’ rate class and not that of the facility owner. The credit value shall be the distribution, transition, transmission, and standard-offer supply rates of the bill credit recipients.

Any value of bill credits not transferred from the shared solar facility shall be included in the total performance-based incentive, which shall be paid in accordance with the tariffs established by the electric distribution company.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 149, § 5; P.L. 2016, ch. 163, § 5.

39-26.6-27.
Community remote distributed generation system.

In order to facilitate the adoption of participation in renewable energy projects by eligible customers, the board may allocate a portion of the annual MW goal to a separate class, or classes, of community remote distributed-generation systems, which may compete under separate ceiling prices from non-community remote distributed-generation systems, for program years starting on or after April 1, 2016.

Upon such allocation by the board, the electric distribution company shall establish rules and tariffs for program years starting on or after April 1, 2016, which rules and tariffs will set forth the requirements for eligible recipients, credit transfers, consumer protection, and other considerations and terms, with input from the office, for the commission’s review and approval.

The value of credits to be allocated to credit recipients may be a fixed rate provided by the system owner, but shall not be greater than the sum of the standard-offer service, less the renewable energy standard charge or credit, and the transmission and transition rates, of the credit recipient as offered by the electric distribution company in effect at the time of establishing the transfer. If a fixed credit rate is not provided, the default credit will be the sum of the standard-offer service, less the renewable energy standard charge or credit, and the transmission and transition rates, of the credit recipient as offered by the electric distribution company in effect at the time of the transfer.

Any credits not allocated in any month will be valued at the then-current default credit rate, and deducted from the total performance-based incentive of the enrolled system.

Community remote distributed-generation systems shall not:

Comprise more than thirty percent (30%) of the annual total of capacity available under the renewable energy growth program in each year;

Be subject to a ceiling price that is more than fifteen percent (15%) higher than the then-in-effect ceiling price for the same technology of the same size as recommended by the board and approved by the commission; or

Transfer credits to any account in an amount that in KWh exceeds the prior three-year (3) annual average usage.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 149, § 5; P.L. 2016, ch. 163, § 5.